District of Columbia statutes.
47-1527

Failure to file or fraudulent return; collection and enforcement.

(a)

If a person fails to make or file a return required or files a fraudulent return, the Mayor shall make the return for the person based upon information that the Mayor may obtain through testimony or other sources.

(b)

A return made according to subsection (a) of this section and signed by the Mayor shall be sufficient for all purposes related to the collection and enforcement of the personal property tax.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 8, 34 DCR 850
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1527.